dev/verbs/tgl.lexc
LEXICON PartStems
@R.ALPH.b@ili	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.l@inis	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.p@ili	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.t@ahi	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.k@uha	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.l@iban	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.a@buso	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.t@anggap	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.a@kusa	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.k@uha	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.a@rte	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.d@agdag	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@ulong	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.g@alit	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.g@alit	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.g@alit	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.i@nis	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@agot	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.l@apit	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.d@ating	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.h@ingí'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.t@anong	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.a@kala	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.l@usob	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.k@amit	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.d@alo	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.p@ansin	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.a@kit	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.l@ayó'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.l@ayó'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@amá'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.b@awal	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.t@ahol	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.u@mpisa	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.n@iwala	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.l@aki	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.a@nak	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.k@agat	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.l@aga	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.h@iram	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.u@tang	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.y@abang	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@irá'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.b@asag	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.p@unit	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.b@alí'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@irá'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.w@asak	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.h@inga	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.d@ala	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.h@atid	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@áma	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.b@alik	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.u@wí'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.l@abas	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.b@uhay	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.a@kyat	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@ipilyo	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@uklay	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.t@ayó'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@unog	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.d@ighay	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.t@awag	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.t@awag	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.d@ala	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@unong	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.p@asan	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.b@itbit	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.k@ipkip	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@aló	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.h@uli	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.a@bot	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.p@alit	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.b@ihis	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.d@aya'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.p@ili'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.p@alakpak	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.l@inis	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.l@inis	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.a@kyat	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@ará	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.i@pon	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.p@unta	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.b@alik	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.g@aling	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.l@íto	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.p@atuloy	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.u@sap	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.l@utó'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.k@opya	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.b@ilang	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.l@igaw	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.t@akip	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.t@akip	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.g@awá'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.t@awid	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.i@yak	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.g@amot	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.n@aggamot	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.p@útol	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.h@iwa'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.t@atad	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.g@ayat	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.g@upit	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@ibak	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.p@únit	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.p@ugot	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.t@anggal	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@irá'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@ayaw	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.n@agsasayaw	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.l@inlang	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.d@alá	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.a@lís	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@irá'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@irá'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.u@nlad	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.p@atay	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.h@atí'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.h@ílo	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.g@áwa'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.g@uhit	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.b@ihis	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.h@ubad	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.i@nom	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.m@aneho	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.h@ulog	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.b@agsak	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.b@ába'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.h@atíd	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.k@ain	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.t@áas	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.t@anan	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.y@akap	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@ayá	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.p@asok	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@uót	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.l@ibang	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.b@urá	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@urí'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.t@ingín	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@ulit	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.l@ábas	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.h@árap	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.h@ulog	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@aká	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.k@ain	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.d@amdám	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.d@ama	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.g@áling	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.l@aban	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.p@unó'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.h@anap	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.i@sdá'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.l@ípad	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@únod	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.l@imot	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.l@imot	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.t@ákot	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.b@úsog	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.p@úno'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@ugal	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.k@uhá'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.r@egalo	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.b@igay	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@ukó'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.p@untá	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.l@ayas	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.b@abá'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.t@uloy	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.l@abas	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.a@kyat	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.p@aalam	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.t@ápos	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.b@igay	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.b@ati'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.l@aki	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.b@antay	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.g@upit	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.k@amay	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.k@amay	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@ampay	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@ayá	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@ayá	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@uklam	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.g@áling	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.d@ínig	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.k@inig	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.i@nit	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.k@umusta	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.t@ulong	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.t@ago'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.t@ago'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.l@akad	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@untok	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.p@ukpok	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.t@ira	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.h@awak	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.y@akap	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.d@ali'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@ákit	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@ákit	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@ákit	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.b@uti	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@uot	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.l@agay	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.k@ilala	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.k@ita	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.i@mbento	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.i@mbita	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@ali	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@ali	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@ama	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.l@oko	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.t@alon	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.t@ago'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.t@abí	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.p@átay	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.k@atay	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.h@álik	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.k@átok	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.g@ibá'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.k@ilala	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.t@awa	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.l@abá	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.l@ágay	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@inungaling	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.h@iga'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.i@law	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.k@inig	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.u@tang	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.t@ingin	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.w@alá'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.i@big	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.m@ahal	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.g@áwa'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.p@alengke	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.k@asal	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.t@imbang	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@ukat	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.k@íta	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.l@ipat	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.l@ipat	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.u@sog	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.u@sog	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@iesta	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.n@agpahinga	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.k@ailangan	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.h@indí'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.t@ángo'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.i@ngay	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.i@ngay	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@únod	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.m@ásid	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.o@kupá	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.y@ari'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.b@úkas	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.b@úkas	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.u@tos	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.o@rder	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.p@inta	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.p@inta	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.g@arahe	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.p@arada	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.p@asa	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.d@aan	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.p@asa	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@anlá'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.b@ayad	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@ilip	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.p@ili'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.d@ampot	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@undó'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.l@agay	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.t@anim	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.l@aró'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.t@ugtog	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.p@angako'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.t@uro'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.b@uhos	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@imangot	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.d@asal	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.h@andá'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.h@andá'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.p@lantsa	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.g@anda	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.g@anda	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.p@igil	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.p@romote	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.t@aguyod	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.h@ila	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.t@ulak	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.l@agay	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.p@asok	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@ubo'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.b@ukas	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@uot	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.a@lis	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.b@ába'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.t@anong	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.b@ilis	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.t@ahimik	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.a@yaw	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.a@rúga'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.a@laga	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.l@aki	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.t@aas	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.a@bot	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.d@atingrating	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.b@asa	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.t@anggap	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.a@yaw	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.t@anggi	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.a@lala	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.h@ubad	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.a@lis	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.a@lis	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.u@pa	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.a@rkila	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.r@enta	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.u@lit	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.u@lit	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.u@lat	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.b@alita	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@umbong	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@auli'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.p@alit	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.u@lit	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@akay	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.t@áyo'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.b@angon	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.n@akaw	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.g@ulong	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.k@usot	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.h@agod	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.m@asahe	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.t@akbo	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.l@ungkot	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@abi	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.t@akot	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.k@ita	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.b@enta	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.t@ahi'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@igaw	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@igaw	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.p@irma	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@enyas	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.a@wit	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.l@ubog	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.u@po'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.t@ulog	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.h@iwa'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.n@giti	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.a@yos	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.t@áyo'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.h@into'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.h@abla	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.d@usa	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.l@unok	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.w@alis	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.k@uha'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.i@ngat	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.a@laga'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.i@ngat	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@alita'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.t@uro'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.b@iro'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@abi	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@uri'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@ubok	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.h@igpit	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.i@sip	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.t@apon	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.l@akbay	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.b@akasyon	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.p@asyal	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.l@ipad	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.b@ukas	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@ara	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.m@akinilya	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.i@ntindi	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.g@amit	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.w@ala'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@uway	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.l@abag	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.d@alaw	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.b@oto	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.h@intay	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.l@akad	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.b@abala'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.h@ugas	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.n@ood	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.b@antay	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.d@ilig	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.k@asal	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.b@ulong	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@ipol	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.w@agi'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.p@unas	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.k@uha	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.a@lis	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.t@aka	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.m@angha'	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.t@rabaho	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.a@lala	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@amba	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.b@alot	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@ulat	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.s@ulat	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.h@ikab	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.o@o	RegSuffixes ;
